Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-560
Peripheral device, defined.

Peripheral device means equipment that connects to the system to allow local use and access to applications on the system. Peripheral device includes, but is not limited to, microprocessors, word processors, desktop computers, terminals, and printers.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 330.